Nevada, session 83, AB459.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 706A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 25, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 25, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 12, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Available platform time” means the period of time
during which a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
is logged into the digital network or software application service of
the company and is available to accept a transportation task.
Sec. 4. “Certified driver support organization” means a
driver support organization that is actively certified by the
Authority pursuant to section 19 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Consumer platform time” means the period of time
after which a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
has picked up one or more passengers to which the driver or
autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable, has been connected
through the digital network or software application service of a
transportation network company to provide transportation
services, and which ends when all such passengers fully
disembark from the motor vehicle operated by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider.
Sec. 6. “Deactivate” or “deactivation” means any action
taken by a transportation network company to restrict or remove
the access of a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to
the digital network or software application service of the company
for a period of 72 hours or more, such that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider is unable to accept a transportation
task through the network or application during that time.
-
*AB459*

– 5 –
Sec. 7. “Dispatch platform time” means the period of time
after which a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
has accepted a transportation task offered through the digital
network or software application service of the company but before
any passenger to which the task pertains has entered the motor
vehicle being operated by the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider.
Sec. 8. “Driver support organization” means a nonprofit or
labor organization whose purpose is to provide education, support
and other services specifically for drivers or monitored
autonomous vehicle providers.
Sec. 9. “Pass-through” means an amount that a
transportation network company pays to a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to reimburse the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable, for costs incurred by
the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider while
providing transportation services, including, without limitation,
reimbursement for tolls.
Sec. 10. “Suspend” or “suspension” means any action taken
by a transportation network company to restrict or remove the
access of a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to the
digital network or software application service of the company for
a period of less than 72 hours, such that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider is unable to accept a transportation
task through the network or application during that time.
Sec. 11. “Tip” means a gratuity that a passenger:
1. Indicates through the digital network or software
application service of the company as intended for direct payment
to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider who
furnished the passenger with transportation services; or
2. Would reasonably expect to be paid in full to a driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider.
Sec. 12. “Transportation task” means a specific trip,
including a shared trip, during which a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider provides transportation services to
one or more passengers with whom the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider is connected through the digital
network or software application service of the company.
Sec. 13. 1. A transportation network company shall adopt a
written policy relating to the deactivation and suspension of
drivers by the transportation network company. The policy
required to be adopted pursuant to this subsection:
(a) Must conform with the requirements of sections 14 and 15
of this act.
-
*AB459*

– 6 –
(b) Is an enforceable term of the agreement entered into
between the transportation network company and each driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider.
(c) Must clearly and specifically describe the kinds of conduct
for which a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider may
be deactivated or suspended, such that each driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider understands his or her obligations
under the policy and can reasonably avoid engaging in such
conduct.
(d) Must indicate, for each particular type of prohibited
conduct listed pursuant to paragraph (c), the specific
consequences that the transportation network company may
impose on the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
based on such conduct, including, without limitation:
(1) The number of days, or the range of days, that the
transportation network company may deactivate or suspend the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider; and
(2) Any other sanction, in addition to deactivation or
suspension, that the transportation network company may impose
based on the conduct.
2. A transportation network company shall:
(a) Make the policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 available
to all drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers:
(1) In English, Spanish, Arabic and three additional
languages that are commonly spoken by drivers and monitored
autonomous vehicle providers in this State, as determined by the
Authority by regulation; and
(2) In an electronic format that each driver and monitored
autonomous vehicle provider can easily access on demand.
(b) Transmit by electronic mail the policy adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 to each driver and monitored autonomous vehicle
provider:
(1) Upon the adoption of the policy; and
(2) If the policy is amended, not less than 14 days before
the amended policy takes effect.
(c) Publish the policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 on an
Internet website maintained by the transportation network
company:
(1) Upon the adoption of the policy; and
(2) If the policy is amended, not less than 14 days before
the amended policy takes effect.
(d) Transmit to the Authority the policy and each amendment
to the policy in each language in which the policy is required to be
published pursuant to paragraph (a) upon the adoption of the
-
*AB459*

– 7 –
policy, or for an amendment to the policy, not less than 14 days
before the amendment to the policy is set to take effect.
3. A transportation network company shall not deactivate or
suspend a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
unless:
(a) The deactivation or suspension is consistent with the policy
adopted pursuant to subsection 1 in effect on the date of the
conduct or other circumstance giving rise to the deactivation or
suspension; and
(b) The policy in effect on that date was transmitted to each
driver and monitored autonomous vehicle provider, posted on the
Internet website of the company and transmitted to the Authority
in accordance with the requirements of subsection 2.
Sec. 14. 1. Within 24 hours after a transportation network
company suspends a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, the transportation network company shall transmit a
written notice to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, in the language that the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider selected within the digital network or software
application service of the company. The notice must:
(a) Describe the basis for the suspension;
(b) Cite the particular provision of the policy adopted pursuant
to section 13 of this act upon which the suspension is based;
(c) Provide sufficient factual information for the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider to understand the
particular reason for which the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider, as applicable, was suspended;
(d) Describe any steps or actions that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider may take, if any, to remedy the
alleged violation of the policy adopted pursuant to section 13 of
this act; and
(e) Contain the notice required pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 20 of this act.
2. Within 24 hours after a transportation network company
deactivates a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider,
the transportation network company shall transmit a written
notice to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, in
the language that the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider selected within the digital network or software application
service of the company, if applicable. The notice must:
(a) Describe the basis for the deactivation;
(b) Cite the particular provision of the policy adopted pursuant
to section 13 of this act upon which the deactivation is based;
(c) Provide sufficient factual information for the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider to understand the
-
*AB459*

– 8 –
particular reason for which the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider, as applicable, was deactivated;
(d) Describe any steps or actions that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider may take, if any, to remedy the
alleged violation of the policy adopted pursuant to section 13 of
this act;
(e) Contain a statement that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider has a right, within 30 calendar days
after receiving the notice, to request a reconsideration of the
deactivation through the process established by the company
pursuant to section 15 of this act; and
(f) Contain the notice required pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 20 of this act.
3. A transportation network company shall transmit any
notice required to be sent to a driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider pursuant to this section to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to which the notice pertains through:
(a) The account of the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider through the digital network or software
application service of the company; and
(b) Electronic mail or another mechanism that allows the
notice to remain accessible to the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider for at least 1 year.
Sec. 15. 1. A transportation network company shall
establish a process through which a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider may seek a reconsideration of a
deactivation of the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, as applicable. When processing such a request though
the process established pursuant to this section, a transportation
network company shall:
(a) Consider all relevant information that is available to the
transportation network company, including, without limitation,
information that can be reasonably obtained from the digital
network or software application service of the transport network
company, information available from public agencies and
information furnished by the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider;
(b) Conduct the reconsideration in good faith; and
(c) Apply in an impartial manner the policy adopted pursuant
to section 13 of this act, consistent with the interests of the
company in safe and efficient operations.
2. A driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider who
has been deactivated by the transportation network company may,
within 30 calendar days after receiving a written notice of the
deactivation pursuant to subsection 2 of section 14 of this act,
-
*AB459*

– 9 –
request in writing a reconsideration of the deactivation through
the process established pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a
transportation network company shall complete a reconsideration
of a deactivation of a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider through the process established pursuant to subsection 1
not later than 14 calendar days after the transportation network
company receives a written request for the reconsideration
pursuant to subsection 2.
4. A transportation network company may have additional
time to complete a reconsideration of a deactivation through the
process established pursuant to subsection 1 if the transportation
network company, within the time described in subsection 3,
notifies the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider who
submitted the request that the transportation network company
needs additional time to complete the reconsideration of the
deactivation and:
(a) The transportation network company has not received
additional information from the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider, as applicable, which is necessary to complete the
reconsideration, if the transportation network company previously
requested such information from the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable; or
(b) Circumstances outside of the control of the transportation
network company prevent the transportation network company
from completing the reconsideration in the time required pursuant
to subsection 3.
5. Within 24 hours after a transportation network company
makes a determination on the reconsideration of a deactivation
requested by a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
through the process established pursuant to subsection 1, the
transportation network company shall transmit a written notice to
the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, in the
language that the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider selected within the digital network or software application
service of the company, if applicable. The notice must contain:
(a) If the transportation network company affirms the
deactivation after reconsideration:
(1) A list of the reasons that the company affirmed the
deactivation;
(2) A description of any steps or actions that the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider may take, if any, to
remedy the violation of the policy adopted pursuant to section 13
of this act for which the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider was deactivated;
-
*AB459*

– 10 –
(3) A statement that the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider has the right to request support relating to the
deactivation from a certified driver support organization certified
by the Authority pursuant to section 19 of this act, if such an
organization is certified on the date of the notice; and
(4) If the Authority has certified such an organization, the
contact information for the certified driver support organization,
including, without limitation, the phone number, Internet website
address and electronic mail address of the organization.
(b) If the transportation network company reverses or vacates
the deactivation based on the reconsideration:
(1) A declaration that the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider did not violate the policy adopted pursuant to
section 13 of this act or remedied the alleged violation of the
policy, as applicable; and
(2) An assurance that the account of the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider on the digital network or
software application service of the company will be restored to full
functionality within 24 hours after the notice is transmitted.
6. A transportation network company shall:
(a) Transmit any notice required to be sent to a driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider pursuant subsection 5 to
the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to which the
notice pertains through:
(1) The account of the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider through the digital network or software
application service of the company; and
(2) Electronic mail or another mechanism that allows the
notice to remain accessible to the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider for at least 1 year.
(b) If the transportation network company vacates or reverses
a deactivation of a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider through the process established pursuant to subsection 1,
fully restore the functionality of the account of the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable, on the
digital network or software application service of the company
within 24 hours after the notice is transmitted pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 16. A transportation network company shall not include
within any agreement between the company and a driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider a provision, with respect
to a dispute relating to a suspension or deactivation of the driver
or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, that:
1. Requires the dispute to be arbitrated, adjudicated or
resolved outside of the geographic boundaries of this State, except
-
*AB459*

– 11 –
that the company may require the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to communicate with persons who
are located outside of this State for the purpose of resolving the
dispute through the process required to be established by
the company pursuant to section 15 of this act, provided that the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider is not required
to travel outside of the State to participate in the resolution of the
dispute.
2. Requires the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider to waive any right or protection to which the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider is afforded under federal
or state law, except that the company may require the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider to waive his or her right
to a trial by jury pursuant to a provision for arbitration.
3. Requires the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider to agree to pay any fee to participate in or initiate an
arbitration, mediation or other extrajudicial process to resolve the
dispute that would exceed the amount that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider would pay to initiate a civil action to
resolve the dispute in the United States District Court for the
District of Nevada, inclusive of any fee reduction for which the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider would have been
eligible if the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as
applicable, were determined to be indigent.
4. Requires the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider to pay the attorney’s fees or costs of the transportation
network company, regardless of the circumstance.
5. Requires that the dispute be adjudicated, arbitrated or
resolved by a person who is not a neutral third party.
Sec. 17. 1. A transportation network company shall, when
offering a transportation task to a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider for acceptance, prominently disclose
to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider on the
interface of the digital network or software application service of
the company:
(a) The distance and cardinal or intercardinal direction from
the current location of the driver to the final destination of the
transportation task;
(b) The total amount the company will pay to the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider for completing the
transportation task, not including any tip or pass-through;
(c) If a passenger has already indicated that a tip will be paid
to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, the
amount of the tip indicated;
-
*AB459*

– 12 –
(d) The estimated mileage that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider will drive from the current location
of the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to the
final destination of the transportation task; and
(e) The estimated amount of time that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider will spend on dispatch platform time
and consumer platform time, combined, to complete the
transportation task.
2. After a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
resumes available dispatch platform time after completing a
transportation task, the company shall disclose to the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider on the interface of the
digital network or software application service of the company:
(a) The total amount of money that the passenger paid to the
company for the transportation services, not including the amount
of any tip or pass-through;
(b) The total amount of money that the company will pay the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable,
for completing the transportation task, not including any tip or
pass-through; and
(c) The total amount of tip that the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider received for the transportation task,
if applicable.
3. Within 24 hours after a driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider completes a transportation task for a
transportation network company, the company shall transmit the
information described in subsection 2 to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to whom the information pertains by
electronic mail or another mechanism that allows the information
to remain accessible to the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider for at least 1 year.
4. Not less than once per month, a transportation network
company shall disclose to each driver and monitored autonomous
vehicle provider who logged into the digital network or software
application service of the company a disclosure that contains, for
the immediately preceding month or, if the disclosure is made
more frequently, for the period since the last disclosure was made,
the following information with respect to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to whom the disclosure pertains:
(a) The total amount of money paid to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, not including any tips or
pass-through;
(b) The total amount of tips paid out to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider;
-
*AB459*

– 13 –
(c) The total amount of time the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider spent on:
(1) Available platform time;
(2) Dispatch platform time; and
(3) Consumer platform time;
(d) The total number of miles driven by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider while the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider was on:
(1) Available platform time;
(2) Dispatch platform time; and
(3) Consumer platform time; and
(e) The total number of miles operated by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable, which are
considered by the Internal Revenue Service to be tax deductible
pursuant to the business mileage deduction rate established by the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, based on the number of
miles known to have been logged when the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider was on:
(1) Available platform time;
(2) Dispatch platform time; and
(3) Consumer platform time.
Sec. 18. 1. A transportation network company shall not
suspend, deactivate or retaliate against a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider based on the lawful acceptance or
rejection of a transportation task offered to the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable.
2. As used in this section, “retaliate” includes, without
limitation, a transportation network company intentionally
limiting the access or availability of:
(a) Support services provided by the company;
(b) Additional offers for transportation tasks, including
decreasing the number of tasks offered to the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider; and
(c) The ability of a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider to select destination or area preferences.
Sec. 19. 1. A driver support organization may be certified
as the certified driver support organization if:
(a) The organization is a labor organization or a nonprofit
organization;
(b) The primary purpose of the organization is to support
drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers in this State;
(c) The organization has operated in this State for at least 4
years immediately preceding any application submitted pursuant
to subsection 2 and, during that time, the primary purpose of the
organization was the purpose described in paragraph (b);
-
*AB459*

– 14 –
(d) The members of the organization have primary control
over the direction and objectives of the organization;
(e) The organization is not directly or indirectly controlled by,
excessively influenced by or otherwise affiliated with a
transportation network company or any other entity that is directly
or indirectly funded or excessively influenced by a transportation
network company; and
(f) The organization submits an application and a proposed
budget that meets the requirements of subsection 3.
2. On or before January 1, 2026, and every 3 years thereafter,
the Authority shall solicit applications from driver support
organizations that seek to be certified as the certified driver
support organization. The Authority shall continue to accept
applications for 60 days after the date on which the Authority
began soliciting applications. On or before July 1, 2026, and every
3 years thereafter, the Authority shall certify, for a 3-year term
that begins on that date, a driver support organization:
(a) That meets the qualifications described in subsection 1;
(b) That has submitted an application that meets the
requirements of subsection 3;
(c) Whose application has been published by the Authority on
an Internet website maintained by the Authority for not less than
30 days, pursuant to subsection 4; and
(d) That the Authority has determined is best suited to serve as
the certified driver support organization based on:
(1) The application materials submitted by the
organization;
(2) Any comments and materials submitted by the public,
including, without limitation, comments received by the Authority
through the mechanism required to be established pursuant to
subsection 4; and
(3) Any additional evidence available to the Authority with
respect to the organization.
3. Each application submitted by a driver support
organization that seeks to be certified as the certified driver
organization must:
(a) State the number of drivers in this State who received
services from the organization in the immediately preceding 12
months;
(b) Describe the activities of the organization and the types of
services that the organization provides drivers and monitored
autonomous vehicle providers in this State;
(c) Identify any instance in the immediately preceding 12
months where the organization assisted a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider in this State with respect to a
-
*AB459*

– 15 –
suspension or deactivation of the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider, as applicable, and, for each such instance,
indicate whether the suspension or deactivation was ultimately
vacated, reversed or otherwise lifted;
(d) Include a proposed budget for the first year of the term for
which the organization seeks to be certified, which may not exceed
7 cents for each transportation task that originated in this State
during the immediately preceding calendar year, based on the
reports submitted to the Authority pursuant to subsection 4 of
section 21 of this act; and
(e) Include such other information as the Authority may
prescribe by regulation.
4. The Authority shall publish any application and
supporting materials submitted by a driver support organization
pursuant to this section on an Internet website maintained by the
Authority. The Authority shall also include on that Internet
website a mechanism through which the public may electronically
submit comments regarding an application published on the
Internet website.
5. An organization that has previously been certified by the
Authority pursuant to this section may again be certified by the
Authority if the organization submits a new application and
complies with the requirements of this section in the same manner
as an organization that has not been previously certified by the
Authority.
6. For the purposes of this section, a driver support
organization that receives funds from a transport network
company pursuant to the provisions of section 21 or 23 of this act
is not directly or indirectly funded by a transportation network
company.
Sec. 20. 1. Upon certifying an organization to serve as the
certified driver support organization, the Authority shall transmit
a notice to each transportation network company holding a permit
issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter. The notice must
contain the name of the organization and the organization’s:
(a) Telephone number;
(b) Internet website address;
(c) Electronic mail address; and
(d) Physical address.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a
transportation network company shall transmit a notice
containing the information described in subsection 3 to a driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider:
(a) After the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
first forms an agreement with the company to provide
-
*AB459*

– 16 –
transportation services for the company but before the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider completes his or her first
transportation task.
(b) Whom the company has suspended or deactivated, upon
such suspension or deactivation.
3. A notice required to be transmitted to a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) The name and contact information of the certified driver
support organization, including all the information described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of subsection 1;
(b) A statement that the organization has met the requirements
of the Authority to be certified and accordingly, has been certified
as the certified driver support organization by the Authority;
(c) A statement that the certified driver support organization is
available to represent and provide support to drivers and
monitored autonomous vehicle providers through processes
relating to suspensions and deactivations; and
(d) A statement that the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider is not required to authorize the certified driver
support organization to represent the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider.
4. A transportation network company is not required to
transmit a notice to a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider pursuant to subsection 2 if the Authority has not certified
an organization to serve as the certified driver support
organization, or if the certification of an organization previously
certified by the Authority has been revoked and the Authority has
not yet certified a different organization to serve as the certified
driver support organization.
Sec. 21. 1. On or before April 1 of the first and second year
of each term of the certified driver support organization, the
certified driver support organization shall submit to the Authority
for approval a budget for the next fiscal year which begins on
July 1 and ends on June 30. The budget may not exceed 7 cents
for each transportation task that originated in this State during the
immediately preceding calendar year, based on the reports
submitted to the Authority pursuant to subsection 4. If the budget
is approved by the Authority, the approved budget must be funded
by the quarterly contributions from transportation network
companies made in the manner set forth in this section.
2. For the first year of the term of the certified driver support
organization, the proposed budget included in the application that
was approved by the Authority pursuant to section 19 of this act
shall be deemed the budget of the organization for that fiscal year.
-
*AB459*

– 17 –
3. The Authority may approve the proposed budget or revise
and approve the proposed budget, based on the extent of services
that the organization provided to drivers and monitored
autonomous vehicle providers in this State during the immediately
preceding year.
4. On or before January 15 of each year, each transportation
network company that holds a valid permit issued by the Authority
pursuant to this chapter shall report to the Authority the number
of transportation tasks undertaken by the transportation network
company that originated in this State during the immediately
preceding calendar year.
5. Not later than 15 calendar days after the end of each
calendar quarter, each transportation network company that holds
a valid permit issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter
shall remit to the certified driver support organization an amount
equal to one-fourth of the approved budget of the certified driver
support organization multiplied by the percentage of
transportation tasks undertaken by the transportation network
company during the immediately preceding calendar year as a
share of all transportation tasks undertaken that originated in this
State, based on the reports submitted to the Authority pursuant to
subsection 4. Not less than 45 days before each quarterly payment
is due pursuant to this subsection, the Authority shall calculate the
amount owed by each transportation network company for that
quarter and transmit a notice to each company that contains the
applicable amount that the company must remit to the certified
driver support organization for that quarter.
6. Any funds received by the certified driver support
organization pursuant to this section or section 23 of this act must
be used for the sole purpose of carrying out the duties and
responsibilities of the organization as described in section 22 of
this act.
7. Not less than once every 6 months, the certified driver
support organization shall:
(a) Certify to the Authority that the organization is in
compliance with the requirements of this section; and
(b) Provide documentation and information regarding the
number of drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers
the organization has served in this State during the immediately
preceding 6 months and the scope of services provided to those
drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers.
8. The Authority:
(a) May, upon request of the certified driver support
organization, increase the amount of the budget currently in
effect, based on the extent of services that the certified driver
-
*AB459*

– 18 –
support organization has provided to drivers and monitored
autonomous vehicle providers in the time since the Authority
approved the existing budget.
(b) May authorize a budget amount to exceed 7 cents per each
transportation task that originated in this State based on the
reports submitted pursuant to subsection 4, provided that the rate
of increase in the maximum per-trip amount allowed does not
exceed the rate of inflation.
(c) May revoke or alter the terms of the certification of the
certified driver support organization at any time if clear and
convincing evidence demonstrates that the organization:
(1) Has used any funds remitted to the organization
pursuant to this section or section 23 of this act for a purpose not
described in section 22 of this act; or
(2) No longer meets the required criteria to qualify for
certification, as described in subsection 1 of section 19 of this act.
9. As used in this section, “rate of inflation” means the
average percentage of increase or decrease in the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the United States Department of Labor for the
immediately preceding 3 calendar years, or if that index ceases to
be published by the United States Department of Labor, the
published index that most closely resembles that index, as
determined by the Authority.
Sec. 22. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the certified driver support organization shall:
(a) Provide driver support services to all drivers and monitored
autonomous vehicle providers in this State.
(b) Upon the written request of a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider:
(1) Represent the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider though any non-judicial procedures for resolving
disputes made available through the agreement between the driver
or monitored autonomous vehicle provider and the company,
including, without, limitation, arbitration, mediation and the
process established by the transportation network company
pursuant to section 15 of this act; and
(2) Support the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider through any process available by law to the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider for resolving a dispute
between the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider and
the company.
(c) Provide education, resources and information to drivers
and monitored autonomous vehicle providers relating to the rights
of drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers under the
-
*AB459*

– 19 –
law and under the agreements between each driver and monitored
autonomous vehicle provider and transportation network
company.
2. The certified driver support organization shall provide
reasonable and fair representation and support to each driver and
monitored autonomous vehicle provider who requests such
representation or support pursuant to subsection 1, subject to:
(a) The ability of the certified driver support organization to
provide such representation or support within the constraints of
the available budget of the organization; and
(b) A reasonable and good faith assessment of the case of the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider.
3. A certified driver support organization shall not:
(a) Refuse to provide reasonable representation or support to a
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider who requests
such representation or support pursuant to subsection 1 in any
manner that is arbitrary, discriminatory or in bad faith.
(b) Advance fees required to be paid by a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider for filing a civil action in any court.
Sec. 23. 1. A transportation network company shall provide
each driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider an
opportunity to deduct earnings from each transportation task the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider completes for
the company, and have such earnings be remitted to the certified
driver support organization if:
(a) At the time of any such deduction, the Authority has
certified such an organization, and the certification is currently in
good standing;
(b) The driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
authorizes the deduction in writing, which may include electronic
mail; and
(c) The driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
indicates the percentage of earnings from each transportation task
that he or she authorizes the company to deduct, which must not
be less than 1.5 percent of the earnings for the task, but not more
than 3 percent of such earnings.
2. If a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
grants authorization to have his or her earnings deducted by a
transportation network company pursuant to subsection 1, the
authorization remains valid until such time as the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider expressly revokes his or
her authorization. A driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider may revoke his or her authorization at any time. A
transportation network company shall rely on any representation
made by the certified driver support organization with respect to
-
*AB459*

– 20 –
the granting or revocation of the authorization of a particular
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to have his or
her earnings deducted pursuant to subsection 1.
3. After receiving authorization to deduct earnings from the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider to which the
earnings pertain pursuant to subsection 1, a transportation
network company shall make the first authorized deductions from
the earnings of the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, at the percentage indicated by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, within 30 days after receiving the
authorization.
4. Any earnings deducted by a transportation network
company pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the certified
driver support organization not less than 28 days after the last day
of the month in which those wages were deducted and retained by
the company.
5. Upon the request of a transportation network company, the
certified driver support organization shall reimburse any of the
documented and reasonable costs of the company associated with
administering the deduction of earnings and remittance of those
earnings to the organization pursuant to this section.
6. The certified driver support organization shall not make a
representation that would reasonably lead a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider to believe that:
(a) The driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider is
required to authorize a deduction of his or her earnings pursuant
to this section; or
(b) The amount of earnings that a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider authorizes to be deducted pursuant
to this section will correspond to the level of support or
representation that the certified driver support organization will or
may provide the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider.
Sec. 24. 1. A driver, monitored autonomous vehicle
provider or passenger injured by a violation of NRS 706A.210 or
sections 2 to 25, inclusive, of this act committed by a
transportation network company may bring a civil action against
the transportation network company in any court of competent
jurisdiction to seek any of the following relief:
(a) Declaratory and injunctive relief, including, without
limitation, injunctive relief to enjoin any ongoing activity that
violates the provisions of NRS 706A.210 or sections 2 to 25,
inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Actual damages or $1,000, whichever is greater.
2. If the prevailing party in a civil action described in
subsection 1 is the driver, monitored autonomous vehicle provider
-
*AB459*

– 21 –
or passenger who brought the action, the driver, monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, or passenger, as applicable, is
entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
3. If the Authority determines that a transportation network
company has violated any provision of NRS 706A.210 or sections
2 to 25, inclusive, of this act, the Authority may impose an
administrative fine of $100 for each driver, monitored
autonomous vehicle provider or passenger affected by the
violation. The Authority is not required to consider the factors
described in subsection 2 of NRS 706A.300 when imposing an
administrative fine pursuant to this section.
4. The Authority shall:
(a) Establish an Internet website by which a person may file a
complaint relating to a suspected violation of NRS 706A.210 or
sections 2 to 25, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Adopt such regulations as are necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 2 to 25, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 25. 1. On or before April 1 and October 1 of each
year, each transportation network company which holds a permit
issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter shall compile and
transmit to the Authority a report containing the following
information:
(a) The number of times that the transportation network
company deactivated a driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider during the immediately preceding 6 months;
(b) The number of times that a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider submitted a request through the
process established pursuant to section 15 of this act to request
that his or her deactivation be reconsidered by the company;
(c) The number of requests for reconsideration described in
paragraph (b) that resulted in the transportation network company
reactivating the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
or otherwise reversing or vacating the deactivation of the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider;
(d) The number of requests for reconsideration described in
paragraph (b) that resulted in the transportation network company
affirming the deactivation of the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider;
(e) For each driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
who was deactivated by the transportation network company
during the immediately preceding 6 months, demographic
information furnished by the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider to the transportation network company, as
applicable, including, without limitation:
-
*AB459*

– 22 –
(1) The gender identity or expression of the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider;
(2) The ethnicity of the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider; and
(3) The language selected by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider within the digital network or
software application service of the company, if applicable; and
(f) For each driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider
who logged into the digital network or software application service
of the company during the immediately preceding 6 months:
(1) The driver’s license number of or other unique
numerical identifier associated with the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider;
(2) The total time logged by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider within the immediately preceding 6
months on:
(I) Dispatch platform time; and
(II) Consumer platform time;
(3) The total number of miles logged by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider during the immediately
preceding 6 months on:
(I) Available platform time;
(II) Dispatch platform time; and
(III) Consumer platform time;
(4) The aggregate amount of money the company paid to
the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider during the
immediately preceding 6 months; and
(5) For the amount of money listed pursuant to
subparagraph (4), the following information disaggregated to
show, with respect to the total amount listed pursuant to that
subparagraph:
(I) The amount attributable to base compensation for
providing transportation services;
(II) The amount attributable to tips;
(III) The amount attributable to pass-throughs;
(IV) The amount attributable to any bonus or extra
incentive compensation;
(V) The combined amount of all money paid to the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider attributable to
each transportation task undertaken by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider in the immediately preceding 6
months; and
(VI) The total amount of any money paid to the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider that is not otherwise
described in sub-subparagraphs (I) to (IV), inclusive.
-
*AB459*

– 23 –
2. A transportation network company that is required to
submit a report pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Compile a representative sample of transportation tasks
that the company dispatched to drivers or monitored autonomous
vehicle providers during the immediately preceding 6 months,
using a methodology established by the Authority by regulation;
and
(b) Include within the report submitted pursuant to subsection
1 the following information for each transportation task included
within the sample:
(1) The driver’s license number of or other unique
identifier associated with the driver or monitored autonomous
vehicle provider who accepted the task;
(2) The mileage driven by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider who accepted the task during
dispatch platform time;
(3) Whether the task was completed or cancelled and, if the
task was cancelled, whether the task was cancelled by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable, or the
passenger; and
(4) If the task was not cancelled:
(I) The time that the task began;
(II) The starting and ending zip codes applicable to the
transportation task;
(III) The total time spent on the task by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider on dispatch platform
time;
(IV) The total time spent on the task by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider on consumer platform
time;
(V) The total mileage driven by the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider during consumer platform time;
(VI) The total amount of money that the passenger paid
for the transportation task, disaggregated to show the amount of
any tip, if applicable; and
(VII) The total amount of money the company paid out
to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider for the
task, disaggregated to show the amount of any tip and pass-
through paid to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, if applicable.
3. The Authority shall not disclose to any person who is not
employed by the Authority, for any purpose, the driver’s license
number or any other personal identifying information of a driver
or monitored autonomous vehicle provider that is included within
a report submitted to the Authority pursuant to this section.
-
*AB459*

– 24 –
Sec. 26. NRS 706A.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706A.163 1. A transportation network company may enter
into a contract with a limousine motor carrier whereby limousine
drivers employed by the limousine motor carrier may receive
connections to potential passengers and related services from a
transportation network company in exchange for the payment of a
fee by the limousine motor carrier to the transportation network
company.
2. Notwithstanding any contract entered into pursuant to
subsection 1, a limousine motor carrier shall not provide limousine
services through a transportation network company unless the
transportation network company holds a valid permit issued by the
Authority pursuant to this chapter.
3. A limousine motor carrier which enters into a contract
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Remains subject to the provisions of chapter 706 of NRS and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, including with respect to
limousine services provided pursuant to a contract entered into
pursuant to subsection 1.
(b) Shall notify the transportation network company of any
change in the status of the certificate of public convenience and
necessity of the limousine motor carrier within 24 hours after the
limousine motor carrier receives notice of or becomes aware of such
a change.
4. The fare charged for the transportation of a passenger by a
limousine driver pursuant to a contract entered into pursuant to
subsection 1 is subject to the excise tax imposed pursuant to NRS
372B.140 and exempt from the excise tax imposed pursuant to
NRS 372B.150.
5. A transportation task, as defined in section 29 of this act,
undertaken by a limousine driver pursuant to a contract entered
into pursuant to subsection 1 is subject to the excise tax imposed
pursuant to section 29 of this act.
Sec. 27. NRS 706A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706A.210 1. A transportation network company which
connected a passenger to a driver, monitored autonomous vehicle
provider or limousine driver when providing limousine services
shall, within a reasonable period following the provision of
transportation services or limousine services by the driver,
monitored autonomous vehicle provider or limousine driver to the
passenger, transmit to the passenger an electronic receipt, which
must include, without limitation:
[1.] (a) A description of the point of origin and the destination
of the transportation services or limousine services;
-
*AB459*

– 25 –
[2.] (b) The total time for which transportation services or
limousine services were provided;
[3.] (c) The total distance traveled; and
[4.] (d) An itemization of the fare, if any, charged for the
transportation services or limousine services.
2. A transportation network company shall disclose the
following information to a passenger who was connected with a
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider before the
company offers the passenger the opportunity to tip the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider, as applicable:
(a) The total fare that the passenger paid or will pay for the
transportation services, before any tip, if applicable; and
(b) The total amount of money that the transportation network
company will pay to the driver or monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, as applicable, for providing the transportation services,
before tip and excluding pass-throughs, as applicable.
3. The information required to be disclosed to a passenger
pursuant to subsection 2 must be:
(a) Prominently displayed on the digital network or software
application service of the company before the option to tip is
displayed on the digital network or software application service of
the company;
(b) Additionally sent to the passenger though electronic mail;
(c) Displayed a font larger than the font used in the electronic
mail or to present any other information in the digital network or
software application service of the company, as applicable; and
(d) Presented using design techniques intended to draw the eye
to the information.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Pass-through” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 9
of this act.
(b) “Tip” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 11 of this
act.
Sec. 28. Chapter 372B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 29 and 30 of this act.
Sec. 29. 1. In addition to any other fee or assessment
imposed pursuant to this chapter, including, without limitation,
the excise taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 372B.140, an excise tax
is hereby imposed on the use of a digital network or software
application service of a transportation network company to
connect a passenger to a driver for the purpose of providing
transportation services at the rate of $1 for each transportation
task that originates in this State.
2. The Department shall charge and collect from each
transportation network company the excise tax imposed pursuant
-
*AB459*

– 26 –
to subsection 1. The Department shall deposit all fees, taxes,
interest and penalties paid pursuant to this section with the State
Treasurer for credit to the State General Fund. The State
Treasurer shall separately account for the payments made
pursuant to this section.
3. The State Controller, acting upon the collection data
furnished by the Department, shall, monthly:
(a) Transfer 1.75 percent of all fees, taxes, interest and
penalties collected during the preceding month which derive from
the tax imposed by this section to the appropriate account in the
State General Fund as compensation to the State for the cost of
collecting the tax.
(b) Determine for each county an amount of money equal to
any fees, taxes, interest and penalties collected during the
preceding month which derive from the tax imposed by this section
for transportation tasks that originated in that county, less the
amount transferred to the State General Fund pursuant to
paragraph (a).
(c) Transfer the amount determined for each county to the
Intergovernmental Fund and remit the money to:
(1) In a county that has created a regional transportation
commission pursuant to NRS 277A.170, the regional
transportation commission.
(2) In a county other than a county described by
subparagraph (1), the county treasurer.
4. The money received by a regional transportation
commission or county pursuant to subsection 3 must be used only
to pay the cost of establishing, operating or maintaining a public
transit system, including any improvement thereto.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Public transit system” means a system employing motor
buses, rails or any other means of conveyance, by whatever type of
power, that is operated for the conveyance of members of the
general public.
(b) “Transportation task” means a specific trip, including a
shared trip, during which a driver provides transportation services
to one or more passengers with whom the driver is connected
through the digital network or software application service of a
transportation network company.
Sec. 30. 1. In addition to any other fee or assessment
imposed pursuant to this chapter, including, without limitation,
the excise taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 372B.145, an excise tax
is hereby imposed on the use of a dispatch center, software
application or other digital means by an autonomous vehicle
network company to connect a passenger to a fully autonomous
-
*AB459*

– 27 –
vehicle for the purpose of providing transportation services at the
rate of $1 for each transportation task that originates in this State.
2. The Department shall charge and collect from each
autonomous vehicle network company the excise tax imposed
pursuant to subsection 1. The Department shall deposit all fees,
taxes, interest and penalties paid pursuant to this section with the
State Treasurer for credit to the State General Fund. The State
Treasurer shall separately account for the payments made
pursuant to this section.
3. The State Controller, acting upon the collection data
furnished by the Department, shall, monthly:
(a) Transfer 1.75 percent of all fees, taxes, interest and
penalties collected during the preceding month which derive from
the tax imposed by this section to the appropriate account in the
State General Fund as compensation to the State for the cost of
collecting the tax.
(b) Determine for each county an amount of money equal to
any fees, taxes, interest and penalties collected during the
preceding month which derive from the tax imposed by this section
for transportation tasks that originated in that county, less the
amount transferred to the State General Fund pursuant to
paragraph (a).
(c) Transfer the amount determined for each county to the
Intergovernmental Fund and remit the money to:
(1) In a county that has created a regional transportation
commission pursuant to NRS 277A.170, the regional
transportation commission.
(2) In a county other than a county described by
subparagraph (1), the county treasurer.
4. The money received by a regional transportation
commission or county pursuant to subsection 3 must be used only
to pay the cost of establishing, operating or maintaining a public
transit system, including any improvement thereto.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Public transit system” means a system employing motor
buses, rails or any other means of conveyance, by whatever type of
power, that is operated for the conveyance of members of the
general public.
(b) “Transportation task” means a specific trip, including a
shared trip, during which an autonomous vehicle network
company provides transportation services to one or more
passengers with whom a fully autonomous vehicle is connected
through the dispatch center, software application or other digital
means by an autonomous vehicle network company.
-
*AB459*

– 28 –
Sec. 31. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 30, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB459*